Nebraska, session 109, LB815A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $137,300 from the Motor Fuel
Tax Enforcement and Collection Cash Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $136,300 from
the Motor Fuel Tax Enforcement and Collection Cash Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 111, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 815, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $99,500 for FY2026-27 or
$102,500 for FY2027-28.
-1-